Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-184
Administration costs.

The cost of administration of the Deferred Building Renewal Act shall be paid from the Building Renewal Allocation Fund, the State Building Renewal Assessment Fund, the University Building Renewal Assessment Fund, and the State College Building Renewal Assessment Fund in such amounts as may be appropriated by the Legislature. The Governor shall each odd-numbered year submit a specific itemized appropriation request to cover such administrative costs.

Laws 1977, LB 309, § 12;

Laws 1986, LB 258, § 31;

Laws 1997, LB 314, § 9;

Laws 2002, LB 1310, § 12;

Laws 2003, LB 410, § 3.